Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.52.220

Scope of chapter—Community and technical colleges part-time academic employees.

With respect to the community and technical colleges part-time academic employees, the permissible scope of collective bargaining under this chapter shall be governed by RCW 28B.50.4893 and 28B.50.489.

[ 2000 c 128 s 4.]

NOTES:

Construction—2000 c 128: "Nothing contained in this act may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement." [ 2000 c 128 s 5.]